Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.090

Auditing committee and expenditures.

All accounts shall be audited by a committee of board members chosen in such manner as the board so determines to be styled the "auditing committee," and, except as otherwise provided by law, no expenditure greater than three hundred dollars shall be voted by the board except in accordance with a written contract, nor shall any money or appropriation be paid out of the school fund except on a recorded affirmative vote of a majority of all members of the board: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the board from making any repairs or improvements to the property of the district through their shop and repair department as otherwise provided in RCW 28A.335.190.

[ 1990 c 33 s 347; 1983 c 56 s 9; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 118; 1971 c 48 s 34; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.150. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 292 s 14; RRS s 4803. Formerly RCW 28A.59.150, 28.62.150, 28.62.160.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.